Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.140

Examinations—Joint and concurrent examinations.

(1) The director may: Conduct an on-site examination, participate in a joint or concurrent examination with other state or federal agencies, or investigate the books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information used in the business of every licensee or its authorized delegates in conjunction with representatives of other state agencies or agencies of another state or of the federal government. The director may accept an examination report or an investigation report of an agency of this state or of another state or of the federal government.

(2) A joint or concurrent examination or investigation, or an acceptance of an examination or investigation report, does not preclude the director from conducting an examination or investigation under this chapter. A joint report or a report accepted under this section is an official report of the director for all purposes.

[ 2017 c 30 s 11; 2003 c 287 s 16.]